Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF375.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2523YH (1) 91 je/js H.F. 375 Section 1. Section 91D.1, subsection 1, paragraph b, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 b. Every employer, as defined in the federal Fair Labor 3 Standards Act of 1938, as amended to January 1, 2007 July 1, 4 2025 , shall pay to each of the employerâs employees, as defined 5 in the federal Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938, as amended to 6 January 1, 2007 July 1, 2025 , the state hourly wage stated in 7 paragraph âaâ provided in this chapter , or the current federal 8 minimum wage, pursuant to 29 U.S.C. Â§206, as amended, whichever 9 is greater. 10 Sec. 2. Section 91D.1, subsection 3, paragraph b, 11 unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as 12 follows: 13 For purposes of this chapter section , a franchisor shall 14 not be considered to be an employer of a franchisee or of an 15 employee of a franchisee unless any of the following conditions 16 apply: 17 Sec. 3. Section 91D.1, subsections 4, 5, and 6, Code 2025, 18 are amended to read as follows: 19 4. For purposes of this chapter section , âemployeeâ does 20 not include an independent contractor as described in section 21 85.61, subsection 12 , paragraph âcâ , subparagraph (3). 22 5. The director of the department of inspections, appeals, 23 and licensing shall adopt rules to implement and administer 24 this section chapter . 25 6. This section chapter shall be enforced pursuant to 26 chapter 91A . 27 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 91D.2 Minimum wage ââ direct care 28 professionals. 29 1. For purposes of this section, âdirect care professionalâ 30 means an individual who provides supportive services and care, 31 including but not limited to personal care, independent living 32 skills, and basic health care services, in a nursing facility, 33 in the home, or in a child care center, to people experiencing 34 illnesses or disabilities and who receives compensation for 35 -1- LSB 2523YH (1) 91 je/js 1/ 2 H.F. 375 such services. âDirect care professionalâ includes but is not 1 limited to direct support professionals, direct care workers, 2 supported community living workers, home health aides, and 3 certified nurse aides. 4 2. Notwithstanding section 91D.1, the state hourly wage for 5 an employee employed as a direct care professional shall be 6 at least $20.00 as of July 1, 2025. Notwithstanding section 7 91D.1, the state hourly wage for an employee employed as a 8 direct care professional who has not completed ninety calendar 9 days of employment with the employer shall be at least $19.10 10 as of July 1, 2025. 11